Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB858.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 25COUNTY PROPERTY CONTACT INFORMATION LISTSec.2501. Definitions.2502. Establishment.2503. Requirement.2504. EXEMPTION.2504 2505 . Contact information. 2505 2506 . Access to information on list. 2506 2507 . Penalties. <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 2507 2508 . Confidentiality. § 2501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business." An association as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), not including a limited liability company."Chief assessor." Any of the following:(1) In a county of the first class, the chief assessment officer, or any successor officer, appointed to direct the office of property assessment or make and supervise the making of all assessments and valuations of all subjects of real property taxation in any successor office.(2) In a county of the second class, the chief assessment officer, or any successor officer, appointed to direct the office of property assessments or make and supervise the making of all assessments and valuations of all subjects of real property taxation in any successor office.(3) In a county of the second class A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh or eighth class, or home rule county formerly of any of those classifications, the individual appointed by the board of county commissioners, or the body or individual exercising the equivalent authority in a home rule county, with the advice of the board of assessment appeals, in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 8831 (relating to chief assessor)."Limited liability company." As defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102."List." A property contact list established and maintained by a chief assessor under section 2502 (relating to 20250HB0858PN1806 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment)."OWNER-OCCUPANT REAL PROPERTY." A REAL PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED AND OCCUPIED BY AN INDIVIDUAL AS THE INDIVIDUAL'S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE AND DOMICILE."REAL PROPERTY OWNER." INCLUDES A CORPORATION, PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, BUSINESS TRUST, OTHER ASSOCIATION, ESTATE, TRUST, FOUNDATION OR INDIVIDUAL.§ 2502. Establishment.A chief assessor shall establish and maintain a list for the real properties located within the county.§ 2503. Requirement.Contact information for a real property shall be added to the list under the following circumstances AS FOLLOWS : (1) if a real property owner voluntarily submits the information to the chief assessor, the chief assessor shall add the information to the list; or WITHIN 30 DAYS OF PURCHASE OF A REAL PROPERTY WITHIN THE COUNTY, A REAL PROPERTY OWNER SHALL SUBMIT CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CHIEF ASSESSOR IN THE MANNER AND FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE CHIEF ASSESSOR WHO SHALL ADD THE CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE LIST; OR(2) if a real property owner is cited for a violation of a municip al ordinance or code, the municipality shall collect the contact information for the real property and relay the contact information to the chief assessor who shall add the contact information to the list.§ 2504. EXEMPTION.THIS CHAPTER SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN OWNER-OCCUPANT REAL PROPERTY.§ 2504 2505 . Contact information. 20250HB0858PN1806 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Contact information.--The following contact information shall be provided to the chief assessor when required or permitted:(1) If the buyer or owner of a real property is an individual, the individual's name, residential address, telephone number and email address.(2) If the buyer or owner of a real property is a business, the business's name, business address and telephone number and email address of one owner or employee of the business. The owner or business shall provide the contact information of an individual, representative or employee who has the authority and ability to repair, maintain or otherwise remedy a problem or municipal code violation for the real property, including the individual, representative or employee's name, address, telephone number and email address to the chief assessor.(3) If the buyer or owner of a real property is a limited liability company, the name of the company, company address and telephone number and email address of one member or manager with ownership interest or right in the limited liability company. The owner or limited liability company shall provide the contact information of an individual, representative or employee who has the authority and ability to repair, maintain or otherwise remedy a problem or municipal code violation for the real property, including the individual, representative or employee's name, address, telephone number and email address to the chief assessor.(b) Changes.--If the contact information collected under subsection (a) changes, the real property owner or the owner's representative shall notify the chief assessor with current 20250HB0858PN1806 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information within 30 days. If the owner fails to notify the chief assessor of changes, the owner may be subject to penalties under section 2506 2507 (relating to penalties). § 2505 2506 . Access to information on list. A municipality may request contact information for a real property from the chief assessor. The chief assessor shall share the information with the requester if the municipality demonstrates a reasonable need and use for the contact information, which shall include a discussion with the real property owner regarding real property maintenance and upkeep. The request must include an affirmation that the requested information will not be used for commercial purposes or purposes other than those made in the request.§ 2506 2507 . Penalties. A county may levy a fine of up to $500 against an individual, business or limited liability company A REAL PROPERTY OWNER OR THE OWNER'S REPRESENTATIVE that intentionally or knowingly provides false or incorrect contact information or intentionally or knowingly fails to update contact information with the chief assessor as required by this chapter.§ 2507 2508 . Confidentiality. A program participant under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6703 (relating to address confidentiality program) may not be required to provide their actual address or have it disclosed under this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0858PN1806 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425